Utah statutes.
32B-10-603.   Specific application requirements for religious wine use permit.

(1)  To purchase an alcoholic product from the department at the department's cost plus freight charges, a religious organization shall obtain a religious wine use permit.

(2)  To obtain a religious wine permit, a person shall comply with Section 32B-10-202.

(3)  The one-time special use permit fee for a religious wine use permit is $125.

